Hawaii, session 2026, GM1282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION I. Chapter 201, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
”§201- Hawaii-Ireland trade commission; established;
membership; duties. (a) There is established within the
department, for administrative purposes only, the Hawaii-Ireland
trade commission. The commission shall consist of five members
who shall be appointed as follows:
(1) Three members to be appointed by the governor without
regard to section 26-34;
(2) One member to be appointed by the speaker of the house
of representatives; and
(3) One member to be appointed by the president of the
senate.
Each member shall be appointed for a four-year term;
provided that each member shall hold office until reappointed by
the member's respective appointing authority at the end of the
2026-3510 HB1391 CD2 HMSO
■IIIIINMHHIIIOIIIIIMflllM

Page 2 H.B. NO. 1391
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 2
member's term or until the member's successor is appointed. Any
vacancy shall be filled by the respective appointing authority.
All initial appointments shall be made no later than
October 1, 2026.
(b) The members of the commission shall elect a
chairperson and vice chairperson from among themselves.
(c) Any action taken by the commission shall be approved
by a simple majority of its members. A majority of the members
of the commission shall constitute a quorum to do business.
(d) Each member of the commission shall have:
(1) Knowledge of^ or current or past involvement in,
organizations that promote Irish affairs; or
(2) An interest in the well-being of trade relations
between Hawaii and Ireland.
(e) The commission shall:
(1) Advance bilateral trade and investment between Hawaii
and Ireland;
(2) Initiate joint action on policy issues of mutual
interest to Hawaii and Ireland;
(3) Promote business and academic exchanges between Hawaii
and Ireland;
2026-3510 HB1391 CD2 HMSO
MiiHiiiniiniiinioi

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 2
(4) Encourage mutual economic support between Hawaii and
Ireland;
(5) Encourage mutual investment in the infrastructure of
Hawaii and Ireland; and
(6) Address any other issues as determined by the
commission.
(f) Beginning with the regular session of 2028^ no later
than twenty days before the convening of each regular session,
the commission shall submit to the legislature and governor a
report of its work, during the previous year.
(g) The commission may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91
to implement this section.
(h) As used in this section, "commission" means the
Hawaii-Ireland trade commission."
SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval
and shall be repealed on June 30, 2031.
2026-3510 HB1391 CD2 HMSO

iiimiiiiiiiiiiniiiiiiiiniiiiig

H.B. NO 1391
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 2
APPROVED this 26th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1391, HD 1, SD 1,CD2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1391, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW AFI
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
189-26